Hawaii statutes.
§576B-315 Nonparentage as defense. A
party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined by or pursuant
to law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under this
chapter. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next